src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/no-no-g3.ctb
# liblouis: Norwegian literary braille, 6-dot, contracted level 3
#
#-name: Norsk litterær punktskrift, 6-punkt, kortskrift nivå 3
#-index-name: Norwegian, contracted, grade 3
#-display-name: Norwegian grade 3 contracted braille
#
#+language:no
#+language:nb
#+language:nn
#+type:literary
#+direction:both
#+dots:6
#+grade:3
#+contraction:full
#
#  Copyright (C) 2005 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2005-2012 Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
#-copyright: 2005, ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#-copyright: 2005-2012, Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Created June 9, 2005 by Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com> with
# help and guidance from Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>.
# Modified Sep 30, 2005 by LU
# Modified October 25, 2005
# Last modified July 2012, by lars@lamasti.net
#
#-author: Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com>
#-author: Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
# Official norwegian braille specifications are collected here:
# http://liblouis.org/braille-specs/norwegian
# This specific table is based on the document "Kortskrift i norsk punktskrift - KS04".
#
# Input is expected to be normalized to NFC (fully composed)
#-unicode-form:nfc
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#

include no-no-g2.ctb

# -------------- level 3 contractions -----------------
word absolutt 1-12-234
word akkurat 1-13-1235
endword aktig 25-13
endword aktige 26-13
endword aktigere 26-13-12356
endword aktigeres 26-13-12356-234
# word aldri 1-24									# defined in level 2
# alle														# defined in level 2
# word allerede 1-123-1235				# defined in level 2
# word alltid 1-2345-145					# defined in level 2

word alminneleg 1-123-134-25-1245
begword alminneleg 1-123-134-25-1245
word ualminneleg 136-1-123-134-25-1245
begword ualminneleg 136-1-123-134-25-1245

word alminnelege 1-123-134-26-1245
word ualminnelege 136-1-123-134-26-1245
word alminnelig 1-123-134-25-123
word ualminnelig 136-1-123-134-25-123
begword alminnelig 1-123-134-25-123
begword ualminnelig 136-1-123-134-25-123

word alminnelige 1-123-134-26-123
word ualminnelige 136-1-123-134-26-123

# word altfor 1-1246							# defined in level 2
# word altså 1-16                 # defined in level 2
# begword andre 1-12356						# defined in level 2
# word andres 1-12356-234					# defined in level 2

# begword annen 1-126							# defined in level 2
# word annens 1-126-234						# defined in level 2

# word annerledes 1-1345-1235			# defined in level 2
# begword annet 1-346							# defined in level 2
# endword ar 3456									# defined in level 1
# endword ars 3456-234						# defined in level 1
# word at 1												# defined in level 1

# begge														# defined in level 2
# word blant 12-123								# defined in level 2
# word ble 12											# defined in level 1
# word blir 12-1235								# defined in level 2
# word blitt 12-2345							# defined in level 2
# bruk														# defined in level 2
word burde 12-1456											# level 3 contractions
word både 12-145

# de															# defined in level 2
# word deg 145-1245								# defined in level 2
# word dem 145-134								# defined in level 2
# denne														# defined in level 2
# begword der 23456								# defined in level 2
# dere														# defined in level 2
# word desse 1456-234							# defined in level 2
# word dessuten 145-234-136				# defined in level 2
# word dessverre 145-234-1236			# defined in level 2
# dette														# defined in level 2
# word din 145-1345								# defined in level 2
# word disse 145-234							# defined in level 2
# word ditt 145-2345							# defined in level 2
# word diverre 145-1236						# defined in level 2

endword dom 25-145
endword domde 25-145-1456
endword domen 25-145-126
endword domens 25-145-126-234
endword domer 25-145-156
endword domers 25-145-156-234
endword domet 25-145-346
endword domets 25-145-346-234
endword domane 25-145-1-2346
endword domme 26-145
endword dommene 26-145-2346
endword dommenes 26-145-2346-234
endword dommen 26-145-1345

endword dommer 26-145-1235

# word du 145											# defined in level 2
# begword dykk 145-13							# defined in level 2

endword els 25-15
endword elsar 25-15-3456
endword elsars 25-15-3456-234
endword elsde 25-15-1456

endword elser 25-15-156
endword elsers 25-15-156-234
endword elsen 25-15-126
endword elsens 25-15-126-234
endword elset 25-15-346
endword elsets 25-15-346-234
endword elsne 25-15-2346
endword elsnes 25-15-2346-234
endword elste 25-15-1256
endword elstes 25-15-1256-234
endword else 26-15
endword elsede 26-15-1456
endword elsene 26-15-2346
endword elsenes 26-15-2346-234
endword elsete 26-15-1256

always enb 126-12
always enc 126-14
always end 126-145
always enf 126-124
always eng 126-1245
always enh 126-125
always enj 126-245
always enk 126-13
always enl 126-123
always enm 126-134
always enn 126-1345
always enp 126-1234
always enq 126-12345
always enr 126-1235
always ens 126-234
always ent 126-2345
always env 126-1236
always enw 126-23456
always enx 126-1346
always enz 126-1356
always erb 156-12
always erc 156-14
always erd 156-145
always erf 156-124
always erg 156-1245
always erh 156-125
always erj 156-245
always erk 156-13
always erl 156-123
always erm 156-134
always ern 156-1345
always erp 156-1234
always erq 156-12345
always err 156-1235
always ers 156-234
always ert 156-2345
always erv 156-1236
always erw 156-23456
always erx 156-1346
always erz 156-1356

always enbruk 126-12-13
always ensom 126-25-234
always ensomme 126-26-234
word erte 156-1256
begword erte 156-1256
endword erte 156-1256
word ertes 156-1256-234
endword ertes 156-1256-234
word erne 156-2346
begword erne 156-2346
endword erne 156-2346
endword ernes 156-2346-234
word enhet 126-236
word enheten 126-236-126
word enheter 126-236-156
word enhetene 126-236-15-2346
endword enhet 126-236
endword enheten 126-236-126
endword enheter 126-236-156
endword enhetene 126-236-15-2346
endword erdom 156-25-145
endword erdomar 156-25-145-3456
endword erdomen 156-25-145-126
endword erdomens 156-25-145-126-234
endword erdomane 156-25-145-1-2346
endword erdomanes 156-25-145-1-2346-234
endword erdommen 156-26-145-1356
endword erdommer 156-26-145-1235
endword endom 126-25-145
endword endomane 126-25-145-1-2346
endword endommen 126-26-145-1345
endword endommer 126-26-145-1235

begword et 346

word forresten 1246-1235-234						# level 3 contractions
word forrige 1246-1235-1245
# word fra 124										# defined in level 1
always fra\sog\smed 124-14-146

word frametter 124-1356									# level 3 contractions
word framfor 124-1246
# word fulgte 124-1245-1256				# defined in level 2
# word følg 124-1245							# defined in level 2
# begword følg 124-1245
# always følge 124-1245-15
# word før 246										# defined in level 1
always først\sog\sfremst 124-14-124			# level 3 contractions

begword grupp 1245-1234									# level 3 contractions
word gruppa 1245-1234-1
endword gruppa 1245-1234-1
word gruppe 1245-1234-15
begword gruppe 1245-1234-15
endword gruppe 1245-1234-15
word gruppene 1245-1234-15-2346
begword gruppene 1245-1234-15-2346
endword gruppene 1245-1234-15-2346
word gruppenes 1245-1234-15-2346-234
endword gruppenes 1245-1234-15-2346-234
word gruppen 1245-1234-126
begword gruppen 1245-1234-126
endword gruppen 1245-1234-126
word gruppens 1245-1234-126-234
begword gruppens 1245-1234-126-234
endword gruppens 1245-1234-126-234
word grupper 1245-1234-156
begword grupper 1245-1234-156
endword grupper 1245-1234-156
word gruppers 1245-1234-156-234
endword gruppers 1245-1234-156-234

word går 1245-1235								
word gått 1245-2345											# level 3 contractions

word heldig 125-145											# level 3 contractions
word uheldig 136-125-145
begword heldig 125-145									# level 3 contractions
begword uheldig 136-125-145

endword het 236													# level 3 contractions
endword heten 236-126
endword heter 236-156
endword hetene 236-15-2346

# word hun 136										# already in level 1
# hverandre												# defined in level 2
begword hvor 23456

endword ing 25-24
always ings 25-24-234
endword ingar 25-24-3456
endword ingars 25-24-3456-234
endword ingde 25-24-1456
endword ingen 25-24-126
endword ingens 25-24-126-234
endword inger 25-24-156
endword ingers 25-24-156-234
endword inget 25-24-346
endword ingets 25-24-346-234
endword ingte 25-24-1256
endword ingets 25-24-346-234
endword inga 25-24-1
endword ingade 25-24-1-1456
endword ingaen 25-24-1-126
endword ingaens 25-24-1-126-234
endword ingaer 25-24-1-156
endword ingaers 25-24-1-156-234
endword ingaet 25-24-1-346
endword ingaets 25-24-1-346-234
endword ingate 25-24-1-1256
endword ingane 25-24-1-2346
endword inganes 25-24-1-2346-234

endword inge 26-24
endword ingene 26-24-2346
endword ingenes 26-24-2346-234

word istedenfor 24-356-1246
word jamvel 245-1236
endword leg 25-1245
endword legar 25-1245-3456
endword legars 25-1245-3456-234
endword legde 25-1245-1456
endword legdes 25-1245-1456-234
endword legen 25-1245-126
endword legens 25-1245-126-234
endword leger 25-1245-156
endword legers 25-1245-156-234
endword leget 25-1245-346
endword legets 25-1245-346-234
endword legne 25-1245-2346
endword legnes 25-1245-2346-234
endword legte 25-1245-1256
endword legtes 25-1245-1256-234
endword lege 26-1245
endword legene 26-1245-2346
endword legenes 26-1245-2346-234
endword legere 26-1245-12356
endword legeres 26-1245-12356-234
endword legete 26-1245-1256
endword legetes 26-1245-1256-234
endword lig 25-123
endword ligar 25-123-3456
endword ligde 25-123-1456
endword ligdes 25-123-1456-234
endword ligen 25-123-126
endword ligens 25-123-126-234
endword liger 25-123-156
endword ligers 25-123-156-234
endword liget 25-123-346
endword ligets 25-123-346-234
endword ligne 25-123-2346
endword lignes 25-123-2346-234
endword ligte 25-123-1256
endword ligtes 25-123-1256-234
endword lighet 25-123-236
endword ligheten 25-123-236-126
endword lighetens 25-123-236-126-234
endword lighetene 25-123-236-15-2346

endword lige 26-123
endword ligene 26-123-2346
endword ligenes 26-123-2346-234
endword ligete 26-123-1256
endword ligetes 26-123-1256-234
endword ligere 26-123-12356
endword ligeres 26-123-12356-234

# word mange 134										# defined in level 1 contractions
# word manges 134-234								# defined in level 2 contractions
# word med 146											# defined in level 1 contractions
# word meg 134-1245									# defined in level 2 contractions
# word meget 134-346								# -
# word mellom 134-123								# -

endword ment 25-2345
endword mentar 25-2345-3456
endword mentars 25-2345-3456-234
endword mentde 25-2345-1456
endword menten 25-2345-126
endword mentens 25-2345-126-234
endword menter 25-2345-156
endword menters 25-2345-156-234
endword mentet 25-2345-346
endword mentets 25-2345-346-234
endword mentne 25-2345-2346
endword mentnes 25-2345-2346-234
endword mentte 25-2345-1256
endword menta 25-2345-1

endword mente 26-2345
endword mentene 26-2345-2346
endword mentenes 26-2345-2346-234
endword messig 25-134
endword messige 26-134
endword messigere 26-134-12356

# word min 134-1345									# defined in level 2 contractions
